Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1094. SEMINOLE HOSPITAL DISTRICT OF GAINES COUNTY, TEXAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1094.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Seminole Hospital District of Gaines County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.002. AUTHORITY FOR CREATION. The Seminole Hospital District of Gaines County, Texas, is created under the authority of Section 9, Article IX, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.003. ESSENTIAL PUBLIC FUNCTION. The district performs an essential public function in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory in the boundaries of the Seminole Common Consolidated School District No. 1 located in Gaines County as those boundaries existed on April 29, 1971, unless the district's boundaries are expanded under Subchapter D.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.005. CORRECTION OF INVALID PROCEDURES. If a court holds that any procedure under this chapter violates the constitution of this state or of the United States, the district by resolution may provide an alternative procedure that conforms with the constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.006. DISTRICT SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE NOT STATE OBLIGATION. The support and maintenance of the district may not become a charge against or obligation of this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.007. RESTRICTION ON STATE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE. The legislature may not make a direct appropriation for the construction, maintenance, or improvement of a district facility.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1094.051. BOARD ELECTION; TERM. (a) The board consists of four directors elected from single-member districts and three directors elected from the district at large.

(b) Directors serve staggered three-year terms.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1094.052. NOTICE OF ELECTION. Notice of an election of directors shall be published in accordance with Section 4.003, Election Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in Gaines County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.053. BALLOT APPLICATION. A person who wants to have the person's name printed on the ballot as a candidate for director must file with the board secretary an application in accordance with Chapter 144, Election Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. A person may not be elected or appointed as a director unless the person:

(1) is a resident of the district;

(2) owns property in the district subject to taxation; and

(3) is more than 18 years of age at the time of the election or appointment.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.055. BOARD VACANCY. (a) If a vacancy occurs in the office of director, the remaining directors shall appoint a director for the unexpired term.

(b) If the number of directors is reduced to fewer than five for any reason, the remaining directors shall immediately call a special election to fill the vacancies. If the remaining directors do not call the election, a district court, on application of a district voter or taxpayer, may order the directors to hold the election.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.056. OFFICERS. The board shall elect:

(1) a president and a vice president from among its members; and

(2) a secretary, who need not be a director. (Acts 62nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 102, Sec. 5(d) (part).)

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.057. VOTING REQUIREMENT. A concurrence of four directors is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.058. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR; ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The board may appoint a qualified person as district administrator.

(b) The board may appoint one or more assistant administrators.

(c) The district administrator and any assistant administrator serve at the will of the board and are entitled to the compensation determined by the board.

(d) On assuming the duties of district administrator, the administrator shall execute a bond payable to the district in an amount set by the board of not less than $5,000 that:

(1) is conditioned on the administrator performing the administrator's duties; and

(2) contains other conditions the board may require.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.059. GENERAL DUTIES OF DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR. Subject to the limitations prescribed by the board, the district administrator shall:

(1) supervise the work and activities of the district; and

(2) direct the affairs of the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.060. APPOINTMENT AND DISMISSAL OF STAFF AND EMPLOYEES. (a) The board may appoint to or dismiss from the staff any doctors as the board considers necessary for the efficient operation of the district and may make temporary appointments as warranted.

(b) The district may employ fiscal agents, accountants, architects, and attorneys the board considers proper.

(c) The board may delegate to the district administrator the authority to hire district employees, including technicians and nurses.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.061. SENIORITY; RETIREMENT BENEFITS. The board may:

(1) adopt rules related to the seniority of district employees, including rules for a retirement plan based on seniority; and

(2) give effect to previous years of service for district employees continuously employed in the operation or management of hospital facilities:

(A) constructed by the district; or

(B) acquired by the district, including facilities acquired when the district was created.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1094.101. DISTRICT RESPONSIBILITY. (a) The district has full responsibility for providing hospital care for the district's indigent residents.

(b) The district shall provide all necessary hospital and medical care for the district's needy inhabitants.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.102. RESTRICTION ON POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TAXATION AND DEBT. A political subdivision of this state, other than the district, may not impose a tax or issue bonds or other obligations for hospital purposes or to provide medical care in the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.103. OVERSIGHT AND CONTROL. The board shall oversee and control the hospital system and the district's money and resources.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.104. HOSPITAL SYSTEM. (a) The district has the responsibility to establish a hospital or hospital system within its boundaries to provide hospital and medical care to the district's residents.

(b) The district shall provide for:

(1) the establishment of a hospital system by:

(A) purchasing, constructing, acquiring, repairing, or renovating buildings and equipment; and

(B) equipping the buildings; and

(2) the administration of the hospital system for hospital and medical care purposes.

(c) The hospital system may include:

(1) facilities for domiciliary care of the sick, injured, or geriatric;

(2) facilities for outpatient clinics;

(3) dispensaries;

(4) convalescent home facilities;

(5) necessary nurses domiciliaries and training centers;

(6) blood banks;

(7) community mental health centers;

(8) research centers or laboratories; and

(9) any other facilities the board considers necessary for medical and hospital care.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.105. RULES. The board may adopt rules governing the operation of the hospital, the hospital system, and the district's staff and employees.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.106. PURCHASING AND ACCOUNTING PROCEDURES. The board may prescribe:

(1) the method and manner of making purchases and expenditures by and for the district; and

(2) all accounting and control procedures.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.107. DISTRICT PROPERTY, FACILITIES, AND EQUIPMENT. (a) The board shall determine the type, number, and location of buildings required to maintain an adequate hospital system.

(b) The board may lease all or part of the district's buildings and other facilities on terms considered to be in the best interest of the district's inhabitants. The term of the lease may not exceed 25 years.

(c) The district may acquire equipment for use in the district's hospital system and mortgage or pledge the property as security for the payment of the purchase price. A contract entered into under this subsection must provide that the entire obligation be retired not later than the fifth anniversary of the date of the contract.

(d) The district may sell or otherwise dispose of any property, including equipment, on terms the board finds are in the best interest of the district's inhabitants.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.108. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire a fee simple or other interest in any type of property located in district territory if the interest is necessary for the district to exercise a power, right, or privilege conferred by this chapter.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except the district is not required to deposit in the trial court money or a bond as provided by Section 21.021(a), Property Code.

(c) In a condemnation proceeding brought by the district, the district is not required to:

(1) pay in advance or provide a bond or other security for costs in the trial court;

(2) provide a bond for the issuance of a temporary restraining order or a temporary injunction; or

(3) provide a bond for costs or a supersedeas bond on an appeal or petition for review.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.109. GIFTS AND ENDOWMENTS. The board may accept for the district a gift or endowment to be held in trust and administered by the board for the purposes and under the directions, limitations, or other provisions prescribed in writing by the donor that are not inconsistent with the proper management and objectives of the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.110. CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS. A construction contract that involves the expenditure of more than the amount provided by Section 271.024, Local Government Code, may be made only after advertising in the manner provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 271, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.111. OPERATING AND MANAGEMENT CONTRACTS. The board may enter into an operating or management contract relating to a district facility.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.112. CONTRACTS WITH GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES FOR HOSPITALIZATION. (a) The board may contract with a county or municipality located outside the district's boundaries for the hospitalization of a sick or injured person of that county or municipality.

(b) The board may contract with this state or a federal agency for the hospital treatment of a sick or injured person.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.113. CONTRACTS WITH GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES FOR INVESTIGATORY OR OTHER SERVICES. The board may contract with a political subdivision or governmental agency for the district to provide investigatory and other services for the hospital or welfare needs of district inhabitants.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.114. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT; PROCEDURES. (a) When a patient who resides in the district is admitted to a district facility, the district administrator may have an inquiry made into the circumstances of:

(1) the patient; and

(2) the patient's relatives who are legally liable for the patient's support.

(b) If the district administrator determines that the patient or those relatives cannot pay all or part of the costs of the care and treatment in the hospital, the amount of the costs that cannot be paid becomes a charge against the district.

(c) If the district administrator determines that the patient or those relatives can pay for all or part of the costs of the patient's care and treatment, the patient or those relatives shall be ordered to pay the district a specified amount each week for the patient's care and support. The amount ordered must be proportionate to the person's financial ability.

(d) The district administrator may collect the amount from the patient's estate, or from any relative who is legally liable for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a deceased person.

(e) If there is a dispute as to the ability to pay, or doubt in the mind of the district administrator, the board shall hold a hearing and, after calling witnesses, shall:

(1) resolve the dispute or doubt; and

(2) issue any appropriate orders.

(f) The final order of the board may be appealed to the district court. The substantial evidence rule applies to the appeal.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.115. AUTHORITY TO SUE AND BE SUED. (a) The district, through the board, may sue and be sued.

(b) The district is entitled to all causes of action and defenses to which similar authorities are entitled.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. CHANGE IN BOUNDARIES

Sec. 1094.151. ELECTION ON EXPANSION OF BOUNDARIES. (a) On presentation of a petition for an election signed by at least 50 registered voters of Gaines County who do not reside within the district's boundaries, the board shall order an election on the questions of:

(1) expanding the district's boundaries to include the entire county;

(2) the assumption of a proportionate share of district debts; and

(3) the imposition of taxes in the territory to be added to the district.

(b) The board shall order the election not later than the 60th day after the date on which the petition is presented to the board.

(c) The election in the district and the election in the territory to be added must be held on the same day.

(d) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to an election ordered under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.152. BALLOT. The ballot for the election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "Expanding the Seminole Hospital District to include all of Gaines County, the assumption by the additional territory of its proportionate share of the district's outstanding debts, and the levy of a tax not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 of valuation on all taxable property in the expanded area of the district."

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.153. ELECTION RESULTS. The district may not be expanded unless the proposition under Section 1094.152 is approved by a majority of the voters at an election held in the district and by a majority of the voters at a separate election held in the territory to be added.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER E. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1094.201. BUDGET. (a) The district administrator shall prepare an annual budget for approval by the board.

(b) The proposed budget must contain a complete financial statement of:

(1) the outstanding obligations of the district;

(2) the cash on hand in each district fund;

(3) the money received by the district from all sources during the previous year;

(4) the money available to the district from all sources during the ensuing year;

(5) the balances expected at the end of the year in which the budget is being prepared;

(6) the estimated revenue and balances available to cover the proposed budget;

(7) the estimated tax rate required; and

(8) the proposed expenditures and disbursements and the estimated receipts and collections for the following fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.202. NOTICE; HEARING; ADOPTION OF BUDGET. (a) The board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed annual budget.

(b) At least 10 days before the date of the hearing, notice of the hearing shall be published one time in a newspaper or newspapers that individually or collectively have general circulation in the district.

(c) Any resident of the district is entitled to be present and participate at the hearing.

(d) At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall adopt a budget by acting on the budget proposed by the district administrator. The board may make any changes in the proposed budget that the board judges to be in the interest of the residents of the district and that the law warrants.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.203. AMENDMENTS TO BUDGET. The budget may be amended as required by circumstances. The board must approve all amendments.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.204. RESTRICTION ON EXPENDITURES. Money may be spent only for an expense included in the budget or an amendment to the budget.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.205. FISCAL YEAR. (a) The district operates according to a fiscal year that begins on October 1 and ends on September 30, or as established by the board.

(b) The fiscal year may not be changed if revenue bonds of the district are outstanding or more than once in a 24-month period.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.206. AUDIT. (a) The district shall have an independent audit made of the district's financial condition for the fiscal year.

(b) As soon as the audit is completed, the audit shall be filed at the district's office.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.207. INSPECTION OF AUDIT AND DISTRICT RECORDS. The audit and other district records shall be open to inspection at the district's principal office.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.208. FINANCIAL REPORT. As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, the district administrator shall prepare for the board:

(1) a complete sworn statement of all district money; and

(2) a complete account of the disbursements of that money.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.209. DEPOSITORY. (a) The board shall select one or more banks to serve as a depository for district money.

(b) District money, other than money invested as provided by Section 1094.210(b), and money transmitted to a bank for payment of bonds or obligations issued by the district, shall be deposited as received with the depository bank and shall remain on deposit.

(c) This chapter, including Subsection (b), does not limit the power of the board to place a part of district money on time deposit or to purchase certificates of deposit.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.210. SPENDING AND INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by Section 1094.107(c) and Subchapter F, the district may not incur an obligation payable from district revenue other than the revenue on hand or to be on hand in the current and following district fiscal years.

(b) The board may invest operating, depreciation, or building reserves only in funds or securities specified by Chapter 2256, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER F. BONDS

Sec. 1094.251. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. The board may issue and sell general obligation bonds in the name and on the faith and credit of the district for any purpose relating to:

(1) the purchase, construction, acquisition, repair, or renovation of buildings or improvements; and

(2) equipping buildings or improvements for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.252. TAX TO PAY GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (a) At the time general obligation bonds are issued by the district under Section 1094.251, the board shall impose an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to create an interest and sinking fund to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as the bonds mature.

(b) The tax required by this section together with any other ad valorem tax the district imposes may not in any year exceed the tax rate approved by the voters at the election authorizing the imposition of the tax.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.253. GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND ELECTION. (a) The district may issue general obligation bonds only if the bonds are authorized by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) The order calling the election shall provide for clerks as in county elections and must specify:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the presiding and alternate election judges for each polling place;

(4) the amount of the bonds to be authorized; and

(5) the maximum maturity of the bonds.

(c) Notice of a bond election shall be given as provided by Section 1251.003, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.254. MATURITY OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. District general obligation bonds must mature not later than the maximum maturity stated in the order calling the election.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 12, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.255. EXECUTION OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (a) The board president shall execute the general obligation bonds in the district's name.

(b) The board secretary shall countersign the bonds in the manner provided by Chapter 618, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.256. REVENUE BONDS. (a) The board may issue revenue bonds to:

(1) purchase, construct, acquire, repair, renovate, or equip buildings or improvements for hospital purposes; or

(2) acquire sites to be used for hospital purposes.

(b) The bonds must be payable from and secured by a pledge of all or part of the revenue derived from the operation of the district's hospitals.

(c) The bonds may be additionally secured by a mortgage or deed of trust lien on all or part of district property.

(d) The bonds must be issued in the manner and in accordance with the procedures and requirements prescribed by Sections 264.042, 264.043, and 264.046-264.049, Health and Safety Code, for issuance of revenue bonds by a county hospital authority.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.257. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) The board may, without an election, issue refunding bonds to refund outstanding indebtedness issued or assumed by the district.

(b) A refunding bond may be:

(1) sold, with the proceeds of the refunding bond applied to the payment of the indebtedness to be refunded; or

(2) exchanged wholly or partly for not less than a similar principal amount of outstanding indebtedness.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.258. BONDS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION. The following are exempt from taxation by this state or a political subdivision of this state:

(1) bonds issued or assumed by the district;

(2) the transfer and issuance of the bonds; and

(3) profits made in the sale of the bonds.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.259. ADDITIONAL MEANS OF SECURING REPAYMENT OF BONDS. In addition to the authority to issue general obligation bonds and revenue bonds under this subchapter, the board may provide for the security and payment of district bonds from a pledge of a combination of ad valorem taxes as authorized by Section 1094.252 and revenue and other sources as authorized by Section 1094.256.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.260. USE OF BOND PROCEEDS. The district may use the proceeds of bonds issued under this subchapter to pay:

(1) any expense the board determines is reasonable and necessary to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds;

(2) interest payments on the bonds during a period of acquisition or construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, not to exceed five years;

(3) costs related to the physical maintenance of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds:

(A) during an estimated period of acquisition or construction, not to exceed five years; and

(B) for one year after the project or facility is acquired or constructed;

(4) costs related to the financing of the bond funds, including debt service reserve and contingency funds;

(5) costs related to the issuance of the bonds;

(6) costs related to the acquisition of land or interests in land for a project or facility to be provided through the bonds; and

(7) costs of construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, including the payment of related professional services and expenses.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 14, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER G. TAXES

Sec. 1094.301. IMPOSITION OF AD VALOREM TAX. (a) The board shall impose a tax on all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The board shall impose the tax to:

(1) pay the interest on and create a sinking fund for bonds or other obligations issued or assumed by the district for hospital purposes;

(2) provide for the operation and maintenance of the district and hospital system;

(3) make improvements and additions to the hospital system; and

(4) acquire necessary sites for the hospital system by purchase, lease, or condemnation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.302. TAX RATE. (a) The board may impose the tax at a rate not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of taxable property in the district.

(b) In setting the tax rate, the board shall consider the income of the district from sources other than taxation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 1094.303. ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION OF TAXES. The board may provide for the appointment of a tax assessor-collector for the district or may contract for the assessment and collection of taxes as provided by the Tax Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 15, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.304. ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION BY DISTRICT TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. (a) The board may elect to have district taxes assessed and collected by a tax assessor-collector appointed by the board. An election under this subsection must be made by December 1 and governs the manner in which taxes are assessed and collected, until changed by a similar resolution.

(b) The district tax assessor-collector must:

(1) reside in the district; and

(2) own real property subject to district taxation.

(c) The board shall set for the district tax assessor-collector:

(1) the term of employment; and

(2) compensation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER H. DISSOLUTION

Sec. 1094.401. DISSOLUTION; ELECTION. (a) The district may be dissolved only on approval of a majority of the district voters voting in an election held for that purpose.

(b) The board may order an election on the question of dissolving the district and disposing of the district's assets and obligations.

(c) The order calling the election must state:

(1) the nature of the election, including the proposition to appear on the ballot;

(2) the date of the election;

(3) the hours during which the polls will be open; and

(4) the location of the polling places.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.402. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The board shall give notice of an election under this subchapter by publishing once a week for two consecutive weeks a substantial copy of the election order in a newspaper with general circulation in the district.

(b) The first publication of the notice must appear not later than the 35th day before the date set for the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.403. BALLOT. The ballot for an election under this subchapter must be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "The dissolution of the Seminole Hospital District of Gaines County, Texas."

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.404. ELECTION RESULTS. (a) If a majority of the votes in an election under this subchapter favor dissolution, the board shall find that the district is dissolved.

(b) If a majority of the votes in the election do not favor dissolution, the board shall continue to administer the district and another election on the question of dissolution may not be held before the first anniversary of the date of the most recent election to dissolve the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.405. TRANSFER OR ADMINISTRATION OF ASSETS. (a) If a majority of the votes in the election held under this subchapter favor dissolution, the board shall:

(1) transfer the land, buildings, improvements, equipment, and other assets that belong to the district to Gaines County or another governmental entity in Gaines County; or

(2) administer the property, assets, and debts until all money has been disposed of and all district debts have been paid or settled.

(b) If the district makes the transfer under Subsection (a)(1), the county or entity assumes all debts and obligations of the district at the time of the transfer, and the district is dissolved.

(c) If Subsection (a)(1) does not apply and the board administers the property, assets, and debts of the district under Subsection (a)(2), the district is dissolved when all money has been disposed of and all district debts have been paid or settled.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.406. IMPOSITION OF TAX AND RETURN OF SURPLUS TAXES. (a) After the board finds that the district is dissolved, the board shall:

(1) determine the debt owed by the district; and

(2) impose on the property included in the district's tax rolls a tax that is in proportion of the debt to the property value.

(b) On the payment of all outstanding debts and obligations of the district, the board shall order the secretary to return to each district taxpayer the taxpayer's pro rata share of all unused tax money.

(c) A taxpayer may request that the taxpayer's share of surplus tax money be credited to the taxpayer's county taxes. If a taxpayer requests the credit, the board shall direct the secretary to transmit the money to the county tax assessor-collector.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1094.407. REPORT; DISSOLUTION ORDER. (a) After the district has paid all district debts and has disposed of all district money and other assets as prescribed by this subchapter, the board shall file a written report with the Commissioners Court of Gaines County summarizing the board's actions in dissolving the district.

(b) Not later than the 10th day after the date the Commissioners Court of Gaines County receives the report and determines that the requirements of this subchapter have been fulfilled, the commissioners court shall enter an order dissolving the district and releasing the board from any further duty or obligation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2688), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.